California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(c) This section does not impose a mandatory duty pursuant to Section 815.6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 262, Sec. 1.   (AB 440)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

93.

The department may construct and maintain detours as may be necessary to facilitate movement of traffic where state highways are closed or obstructed by construction or otherwise. The department may direct traffic onto any other public highway which will serve as a detour, in which case the department, upon the completion of such use, and upon the request of the local agency having jurisdiction over the highway, shall restore the same to its former condition; provided, that the local agency shall reimburse the department for the amount of all betterment to such highway caused by the restoration. The department shall also reimburse the local agency for all reasonable additional
 expenses incurred by that agency in maintaining said highway during the period of detour if such additional expenses were caused by said detour.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 627.)
-------------------------------------------

94.

(a) The department may make and enter into any contracts in the manner provided by law that are required for performance of its duties, including with federally recognized Indian tribes and entities owned by those
 tribes.

(b) To implement off-reservation traffic impact mitigation contracts with federally recognized Indian tribes, or entities owned by those tribes, all of the following shall apply:

(1) The contract shall provide for the full reimbursement of expenses and costs incurred by the department in the exercise of its contractual responsibilities. Funds for the project shall be placed in an escrow account before project development.

(2) The proposed transportation project shall comply with all applicable state and federal environmental impact and review requirements, including, but not limited to, the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code).

(3) The department’s work on the transportation project under the contract shall not jeopardize or adversely affect the completion of other transportation projects included in the adopted State Transportation Improvement Program.

(4) The transportation project is included in or consistent with the affected regional transportation plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 137, Sec. 1.   (AB 630)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

94.3.

To the extent that existing provisions of Part 23 (commencing with Section 23.1) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended April 27, 1981, are not applicable to highway contracts awarded by the department that are solely state funded, the department shall develop a program to implement comparable provisions applicable to those contracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 790, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

94.4.

(a) It shall be unlawful for a person to:

(1) Knowingly and with intent to defraud, fraudulently obtain, retain, attempt to obtain or retain, or aid another in fraudulently obtaining or retaining or attempting to obtain or retain, certification as a minority business enterprise for the purposes of this article.

(2) Willfully and knowingly make a false statement with the intent to defraud, whether by affidavit, report, or other representation, to a state official or employee for the purpose of influencing the certification or denial of certification of any entity as a minority business enterprise.

(3) Willfully and knowingly obstruct,
 impede, or attempt to obstruct or impede any state official or employee who is investigating the qualifications of a business entity which has requested certification as a minority business enterprise.

(4) Knowingly and willfully with intent to defraud, fraudulently obtain, attempt to obtain, or aid another person in fraudulently obtaining or attempting to obtain, public moneys to which the person is not entitled under this article.

(b) Any person who is found by the department to have violated any of the provisions of subdivision (a) is subject to a civil penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(c) If a contractor, subcontractor, supplier, subsidiary, or affiliate thereof, has been found by the department to have violated subdivision (a) and that violation occurred within three years of another
 violation of subdivision (a) found by the department, the department shall prohibit that contractor, subcontractor, supplier, subsidiary, or affiliate thereof, from entering into a state project or state contract and from further bidding to a state entity, and from being a subcontractor to a contractor for a state entity and from being a supplier to a state entity.

(d) For the purposes of this section, “minority” means an individual who can be identified as being part of one of the following groups:

(1) Black Americans, including, but are not limited to, persons having origins in any of the Black racial groups of Africa.

(2) Hispanic Americans, including, but are not limited to, persons of Mexican, Puerto Rican, Cuban, Central or South American, or other Spanish culture or origin, regardless of race.

(3) Native Americans, including, but are not limited to, persons who are American Indians, Inuit, Aleuts, or Native Hawaiians.

(4) Asian-Pacific Americans, including, but are not limited to, persons whose origins are from Japan, China, Taiwan, Korea, Vietnam, Laos, Cambodia, the Philippines, Samoa, Guam, the U.S. Trust Territories of the Pacific, and the Northern Marianas.

(5) Asian-Indian Americans, including, but are not limited to, persons whose origins are from India, Pakistan, and Bangladesh.

(6) Those persons determined by the department, on a case-by-case basis, as socially and economically disadvantaged in accordance with applicable federal regulations.

(e) For the purposes of this
 section, “minority business enterprise” means a small business concern, as defined in Section 632 of Title 15 of the United States Code, and which also meets the following requirements:

(1) It is at least 51 percent owned by one or more women or minority individuals or, in the case of any publicly owned business, at least 51 percent of its stock is owned by one or more women or minority individuals.

(2) Its management and daily business operations are controlled by one or more of the women or minority individuals who own it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 181.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

95.

Whenever the commission relinquishes any portion of any state highway superseded by relocation and the construction of a freeway and when the department has prior to relinquishment maintained snow removal operations on the portion of state highway relinquished and when property having access to the relinquished portion of state highway was developed for winter recreational purposes at the time of relinquishment, the department may with the consent of the county or counties to which the road is relinquished, maintain snow removal operations on all or a portion of the state highway which has been superseded by relocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2149.)
-------------------------------------------

95.5.

From and after November 8, 1967, the department shall remove snow from that portion of former U.S. Route 40, which has been superseded by the relocation and construction of Interstate Route 80, commencing at its intersection with Interstate Route 80 near Donner Memorial Park westerly approximately four miles to the vicinity of Donner Lake.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

95.6.

(a) The department shall adopt and implement, on or before July 1, 1992, a deicing policy for state highways. The policy shall be set forth in a plan and method for deicing state highways, using all appropriate deicing technologies, while at the same time maintaining highway safety. 

(b) The plan shall be submitted to the Legislature on or before July 1, 1992. All or part of the elements of the plan shall be incorporated in the department’s budget proposal for the 1992–93 fiscal year and budget proposals for subsequent fiscal years. The department shall examine all possible
 funding sources. 

(c) The plan shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following: 

(1) A review of research conducted in California and other states on the use of deicing salt substitutes and deicing technologies. 

(2) When available, the incorporation of applicable technical findings of the ongoing study by the Transportation Research Board of the National Research Council which will analyze the costs to the public and private sectors, including, but not limited to, damage to vegetation, highway structures, and motor vehicles, of using salt as a deicing agent as compared with the use of commercially available substitute deicing materials or techniques. 

(3) A plan for reducing or eliminating the use of salt as a primary deicing agent on
 specified routes, including, but not limited to, State Highway Routes 28, 50, 80, and 89 in the Lake Tahoe Basin, and substituting environmentally safe deicing techniques where significant environmental damage has already occurred, in accordance with the legislative intent expressed in subdivision (f) of Section 1 of the act which added this section. 

(4) An analysis of the direct cost to each state transportation district for both initial capital costs, including repair of road salt’s environmental damage, and annual costs to convert to an environmentally safe deicing policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 318, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

96.

If any directional or traffic control sign installed or maintained by the department within the right-of-way of a state highway is defaced with graffiti in a manner which interferes with the ability of motorists to comprehend the information which the sign was intended to convey, thereby posing a danger to the public, the department shall, as soon as reasonably possible after learning of the graffiti, either remove the graffiti and treat the sign with an anti-graffiti substance or material, or replace the sign, whichever is more practical and economical.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 289, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

97.

(a) A state highway segment shall be designated by the department as a Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zone if all of the following conditions have been satisfied:

(1) The highway segment is eligible for designation pursuant to subdivision (b).

(2) The Director of Transportation, in consultation with the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol, certifies that the segment identified in subdivision (b) meets all of the following criteria:

(A) The highway segment is a conventional highway or expressway and is part of the state highway system.

(B) The rate of total collisions per mile per year on the segment under consideration has been at least 1.5 times the statewide average for similar roadway types during the most recent three-year period for which data are available.

(C) The rate of head-on collisions per mile per year on the segment under consideration has been at least 1.5 times the statewide average for similar roadway types during the most recent three-year period for which data are available.

(3) The Department of the California Highway Patrol or local agency having traffic enforcement jurisdiction, as the case may be, has concurred with the designation.

(4) The governing board of each city, or county with respect to an unincorporated area, in which the segment is located has by
 resolution indicated that it supports the designation.

(5) An active public awareness effort to change driving behavior is ongoing either by the local agency with jurisdiction over the segment or by another state or local entity.

(6) Other traffic safety enhancements, including, but not limited to, increased enforcement and other roadway safety measures, are in place or are being implemented concurrent with the designation of the Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zone.

(b) The following segments are eligible for designation as a Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zone pursuant to subdivision (a):

State Highway Route 12 between the State Highway Route 80 junction in Solano County and the State Highway Route 5 junction in San Joaquin County.

(c) Designation of a segment as a Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zone by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be done in writing and a written notification shall be provided to the court with jurisdiction over the area in which the highway segment is located. The designation shall be valid for a minimum of two years from the date of submission to the court.

(d) After the two-year period, and at least every two years thereafter, the department, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, shall evaluate whether the highway segment continues to meet the conditions set forth in subdivision (a). If the segment meets those conditions, the department shall renew the designation in which case an updated notification shall be sent to the court. If the department, in consultation with the Department of the California Highway Patrol, determines that any of
 those conditions no longer apply to a segment designated as a Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zone under this section, the department shall revoke the designation and the segment shall cease to be a Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zone.

(e) A Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zone is subject to the rules and regulations adopted by the department prescribing uniform standards for warning signs to notify motorists that, pursuant to Section 42010 of the Vehicle Code, increased penalties apply for traffic violations that are committed within a Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zone.

(f) (1) The department or the local authority having jurisdiction over these highway and road segments shall place and maintain the warning signs identifying these segments by stating that a “Special Safety Zone Region Begins Here” and a “Special Safety Zone Ends Here.”

(2) Increased penalties shall apply to violations under Section 42010 of the Vehicle Code only if appropriate signage is in place pursuant to this subdivision.

(3) If designation as a Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zone is revoked pursuant to subdivision (d), the department shall be responsible for removal of all signage placed pursuant to this subdivision.

(g) Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zones do not increase the civil liability of the state or local authority having jurisdiction over the highway segment under Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code or any other provision of law relating to civil liability.

(1) Only the base fine shall be enhanced pursuant to this section.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any additional penalty, forfeiture, or assessment imposed by any other statute shall be based on the amount of the base fine before enhancement or doubling and shall not be based on the amount of the enhanced fine imposed pursuant to this section.

(h) The projects specified as a Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zone shall not be elevated in priority for state funding purposes.

(i) The requirements of subdivision (a) shall not apply to the Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zone established prior to the effective date of this subdivision pursuant to Section 97.4 or to the Safety Enhancement-Double Fine Zones established pursuant to Section 97.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 169.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

97.01.

The following segments are eligible for designation as Safety Awareness Zones pursuant to Section 97.1:

(a) The Golden Gate Bridge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 593, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

97.1.

(a) A highway segment shall be designated as a Safety Awareness Zone if all of the following conditions have been met:

(1) The highway segment is eligible for designation under Section 97.01.

(2) Each local governing body or bodies, with jurisdiction over the area or areas in which the eligible segment is located, has adopted a resolution indicating its support for the designation as well as a Safety Awareness Zone
 Plan addressing education, enforcement, and engineering measures intended to support the designation.

(3) If the highway segment is a state highway, the Safety Awareness Zone Plan has been approved by the Director of Transportation and the Commissioner of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(b) A Safety Awareness Zone designation shall be deemed effective immediately upon satisfaction of all requirements pursuant to subdivision (a) and may remain in effect for a period not to exceed three years from the effective date. The designation may be renewed for a period not to exceed three years. Renewal of a designation for a highway segment that is a state highway shall require the approval by the Director of Transportation and the Commissioner of the Department of the California Highway Patrol of an updated Safety Awareness Zone Plan.

(c) The department shall develop a sign to notify motorists of the presence of a Safety Awareness Zone, and shall place and maintain the signs for as long as the designation is in effect pursuant to this section.

(d) Presence of a Safety Awareness Zone does not increase the civil liability of the state or local authority having jurisdiction over the highway segment under Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code or any other provision of law relating to civil liability.

(e) Projects on a highway segment specified as a Safety Awareness Zone shall not be elevated in priority for state funding purposes.

(f) For purposes of this section, “highway” has the meaning set forth in Section 360 of the Vehicle
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 230.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

100.

Using existing resources, the department shall monitor the cumulative impact of fragmented gaps in the state highway system to identify safety and long-term maintenance issues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 205.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

100.1.

The department is authorized to do any and all things necessary to lay out, acquire and construct any section or portion of a State highway as a freeway or to make any existing State highway a freeway.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 687.)
-------------------------------------------

100.15.

Before the commission approves a capacity-increasing project or a major street or highway lane realignment project, the department or a regional transportation planning agency submitting the project for approval shall demonstrate that reversible lanes were considered for the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 525, Sec. 1.   (AB 2542)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

100.2.

The department is authorized to enter into an agreement with the city council or board of supervisors having jurisdiction over the street or highway and, as may be provided in such agreement, to close any city street or county highway at or near the point of its interception with any freeway or to make provision for carrying such city street or county highway over or under or to a connection with the freeway and may do any and all work on such city street or county highway as is necessary therefor. No city street or county highway shall be closed, either directly or indirectly, by the construction of a freeway except pursuant to such an agreement or while
 temporarily necessary during construction operations. No city street, county road, or other public highway of any kind shall be opened into or connected with any freeway unless and until the commission adopts a resolution consenting thereto and fixing the terms and conditions on which such connection shall be made and the commission may give or withhold its consent or fix such terms and conditions as, in its opinion, will best subserve the public interest.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

100.21.

(a) Whenever a street or highway closing agreement is required by Section 100.2, the department shall not acquire, except by gift, and except in hardship or protective cases as determined by the department or the commission, any real property for a freeway through a city until an agreement is first executed with the city council, or for a freeway through unincorporated territory in a county until an agreement is first executed with the board of supervisors. The department shall give notice to the city council or the board of supervisors, as
 the case may be, of any acquisition of real property prior to the execution of an agreement.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a city council, or a county board of supervisors may, by resolution, authorize the purchase of rights-of-way prior to approval of an agreement if the purchase is limited to the mainline corridor of the proposed freeway and the alignment of the freeway is not at issue.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 615, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

100.22.

The city council or board of supervisors shall, prior to entering into the agreement contemplated by Section 100.2, conduct a public hearing on the subject.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 515.)
-------------------------------------------

100.25.

In addition to the other matters that may be covered by the agreements authorized under Section 100.2, provisions for improvements, revisions or extensions of city streets or county highways leading to or from a freeway, deemed by the department to be necessary in accommodating the freeway traffic in making proper connections between the existing system of city streets or county roads and the freeway, may be included in such agreements and the department may perform such work as a part of the freeway construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1217.)
-------------------------------------------

100.3.

From and after the adoption of a resolution by the commission declaring any section of a state highway to be a freeway, the highway described in such resolution shall have the status of a freeway for all purposes of Section 100.2.

Such declaration shall not affect private property rights of access, and any such rights taken or damaged within the meaning of Section 19 of Article I of the California Constitution for such freeway shall be acquired in a manner provided by law.

No state highway shall be converted into a freeway except with the consent of the owners of abutting
 lands or the purchase or condemnation of their right of access thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 14.)
-------------------------------------------

100.45.

When the department constructs a freeway on the route selected pursuant to Section 100.4 the department shall meet and confer with affected counties and cities with respect to the design of the portion of the freeway to be constructed within the jurisdiction of the affected county or city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1240, Sec. 2.   Effective September 24, 1990.)
-------------------------------------------

100.5.

Whenever the location of a State highway is such that a ferry must be used to completely traverse said highway, and there is no existing ferry furnishing service to traffic on said highway, the department may construct, maintain and operate such a ferry, or may, by cooperative agreement, delegate the construction, maintenance or operation thereof to a county, or if the termini of a ferry are within one or more cities, to the cities concerned. Whenever a highway between the termini of which a publicly owned ferry is used, is declared to be a State highway, the title to the ferry and all appurtenances thereto vests in the State. The department is authorized to promulgate
 reasonable rules and regulations governing the hours of operation of such ferries. The department may impose a charge of not to exceed one dollar per vehicle for the use of such ferries between the hours of 11 p.m. and 5 a.m.; provided, that in no event shall any charge be imposed on any ferry formerly operated by a county where the county maintained free ferry service for twenty-four hours per day at the time the ferry is or was taken over by the department. It is unlawful to operate on any such ferries or the approaches thereto, a vehicle of a size or weight or at a speed, greater than that which any such ferry or its approaches, with safety to itself and to the traveling public, will permit. The department shall determine the maximum size, weight and speed of vehicles which with safety can be permitted on such ferries and shall by appropriate signs notify the public of its determination. It is prima facie evidence of violation of this section to exceed the limit specified by the department upon such
 signs. The department is authorized to recover by civil action any damages done to such ferries or the approaches thereof by reason of a failure to comply with the provisions of this section and a violation of the limits specified on the signs erected by the department is prima facie evidence of such violation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1937, Ch. 931.)
-------------------------------------------

100.51.

Notwithstanding any provision of Section 100.5, whenever any bridge or highway crossing over a navigable waterway in this state, including, but not limited to, toll bridges or other toll highway crossings built or acquired under the provisions of the California Toll Bridge Authority Act, is closed to traffic because of accident thereto or repair thereof or is for any reason unable fully to accommodate traffic, the department may operate a vehicular or passenger ferry as a substitute therefor. In the operation of such vehicular or passenger ferry, the department may impose a toll for passage. For the purpose of imposing such toll, the department may employ any reasonable
 classification of vehicles, including, but not limited to, classification by weight, length, or number of axles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 997.)
-------------------------------------------

100.6.

The department may, on behalf of the State of California, enter into agreements with any adjoining state, or any proper agency of such state, for the construction, reconstruction, operation and maintenance, by any party to such agreement, in the manner and by such means as may be provided in the agreement, of bridges over interstate waters and may enter into like agreements with respect to construction, reconstruction, operation and maintenance of highways within this State or such adjoining state, when such highways are at or near the common boundary of the states. Payment for work done pursuant to such agreements may be made from any fund available to the department for
 highway purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1124.)
-------------------------------------------

100.7.

The department may, for the protection of the State of California, insure any bridge on the State Highway System acquired or constructed under provisions of the California Toll Bridge Authority Act against all risks in any amount up to the full insurable value thereof. In case of damage or destruction, the proceeds of such insurance shall be applied to the restoration of such bridge. Any such bridge may be so insured irrespective of the retirement of all indebtedness incurred for its acquisition or construction, and the cost of such insurance shall be paid from any funds available to the department for highway purposes.

Any such
 bridge, other than bridges over the San Francisco Bay, shall, after retirement of all indebtedness incurred for its acquisition or construction, be maintained and operated as a free bridge and the cost thereof charged to funds available for maintenance of state highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1056.)
-------------------------------------------

100.9.

When any state highway is relocated in such a manner as to bypass a city or business district, the department shall erect and maintain appropriate directional signs, at the junction of the bypass and the road leading into such city or business district, and at a reasonable distance in advance of such junction, for the guidance of traffic desiring to enter the city or business district. Upon relinquishment of the bypassed highway to the county or city concerned, the signs, other than those designating the state or federal route number of such highway, previously erected on such highway shall be left in place by the department and thereafter shall be maintained by such county
 or city. When relinquishing any such bypassed highway, the department shall direct the attention of the county or city concerned to the provisions of this section regarding continued maintenance of such signs by the county or city.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 551.)
-------------------------------------------

101.

(a) The department shall keep in repair all objects or markers adjacent to a state highway which have been erected to mark registered historical places and shall keep such markers free from vegetation which may obscure them from view.

(b) When the Legislature, by concurrent resolution, has designated names for certain districts and state highway bridges, and requested the placing of name plaques at the boundaries of the districts or on the bridges, the department is authorized to expend reasonable sums for such plaques.

(c) Any
 major bridge not previously named by the Legislature may be named by the Legislature, by concurrent resolution, for a serviceman killed in action who was a resident of the county in which the bridge is located. The name shall be selected from names submitted to the department by veterans’ associations as defined by Section 1260 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1346.)
-------------------------------------------

101.1.

(a) The department may place the state’s 9-1-1 emergency telephone number on road signs on all state highways at state entry points and county, city, and town limit entry points. The department shall place and maintain, or cause to be placed and maintained, on all state highways at the city limit of each incorporated city and at the limits of each unincorporated town, as determined by the department, a uniform road sign which sets forth the name of the city or town, its population, and its altitude, as determined by the department. Where the limits of a county, city, or town intersect a state highway at more than two points, the
 department, in its discretion, need erect the signs only at each of the two outermost points on the state highway where the intersection occurs. 

(b) The department shall adopt specifications to provide for uniform signs of permanent character setting forth the information required in subdivision (a). The emergency telephone numbers shall be added to the road signs in subdivision (a) only when the signs are changed for other purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 683, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

101.2.

The department may, when it deems it necessary, replace or cause to be replaced any city limit road sign.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1273.)
-------------------------------------------

101.21.

The department shall, in the next revision of the California Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, allow supplemental destination signs for a state special school that is located within five miles of the highway, regardless of whether the state special school is located in a major metropolitan area, urbanized area, or rural area.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 152, Sec. 1.   (AB 2367)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

101.3.

The department shall submit all plans and specifications for any bridge or other structure across any river or other drainage channel or basin subject to the jurisdiction of the Reclamation Board for approval in accordance with the provisions of the Reclamation Board Act, and shall not construct any such bridge or structure without the approval of the said board. Whenever a bridge or other structure has been constructed according to plans and specifications which have been approved by the Reclamation Board, no change in or replacement or relocation of such bridge or structure shall be required by said board from funds appropriated for highway purposes without the consent of the
 department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 315.)
-------------------------------------------

101.4.

The department shall replace or cause to be replaced any city limit road sign if all the following conditions exist:

(a) If the legislative body of a city requests the replacement.

(b) If the request is based upon a substantial change of population evidenced by a special or general federal census.

(c) If no previous request has been made by the city within a period of five years.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 101.3 by Stats. 1961, Ch. 57.)
-------------------------------------------

101.5.

The department may file for record with the State Lands Commission such maps as are necessary to furnish an accurate description of any ungranted swamp, overflow, tide, or submerged lands, the bed of any navigable channel, stream, river, creek, lake, bay, or inlet, or other sovereign lands of the State of California which, in the opinion of the department, are needed as a right-of-way for, and for the protection of, any state highway or as a source of materials for the construction, maintenance, or improvement of any state highway. Upon the approval of such map by the State Lands Commission, the lands described therein shall be reserved for such use by the
 department and the department is thereupon authorized to enter upon, occupy, and use such lands for such purpose or purposes. Any subsequent grant or permission to use such lands shall be subordinate to such reservation. Any such reservation may be released by the written certificate of the director filed with the State Lands Commission. This section shall not apply to state school lands.

The department shall determine the reasonable value of such right-of-way or materials and shall deposit such amount in the State Parks and Recreation Fund. The amount so deposited shall be considered as part of the cost of construction of the state highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

101.6.

The department shall design, place and maintain or cause to be placed and maintained at appropriate places along state highways signs which indicate the maximum penalty which may be prescribed for throwing or discharging any litter or any flammable or glowing substance from any vehicle outside of a business or residence district. County road commissioners shall place such signs along roads for which they are responsible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 2038.)
-------------------------------------------

101.7.

(a) The department shall adopt rules and regulations that allow the placement, near exits on freeways located in rural areas, of information signs identifying specific roadside businesses offering fuel, food, lodging, electric vehicle charging facilities, camping services, approved 24-hour pharmacy services, or approved attractions, and that prescribe the standards for those signs.

(b) The department shall provide equal access to all business applicants.

(c) (1) (A) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the department shall not approve the placement
 of a sign within an urban area designated by the United States Bureau of the Census as having a population of 5,000 or more.

(B) The department may not remove an information sign that was placed before January 1, 2003, due solely to population growth in an urban area that results in a population of 5,000 or more but less than 10,000.

(2) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the department, until January 1, 2021, shall allow the placement of information signs along State Highway Route 65 within, or at exits leading to, the City of Lincoln and along Interstate 80 within, or at exits leading to, the City of Truckee.

(B) The authorization in this paragraph with respect to information signs along Interstate 80 within, or at exits leading to, the City of Truckee, shall apply only to incorporated areas
 with a population density of less than one person per acre surrounded entirely by land of the Tahoe National Forest.

(C) On or before January 1, 2020, the department shall report to the transportation committees of the Senate and Assembly on the implementation of this paragraph. The report shall describe the implementation and any benefits of, or concerns regarding, that implementation, and shall include recommendations as to whether or not the period of this program should be extended and whether or not the authorization for information signs under this section should be expanded to urban areas having a population of 5,000 or more.

(d) The information signs authorized in this section may be placed near the freeway exits in addition to, or in lieu of, other highway signs of the department, but not in lieu of on-premises or off-premises highway oriented business signs and
 directional signs.

(e) The department shall establish and charge a fee to place and maintain information signs in an amount not less than 25 percent above its estimated cost in placing and maintaining the information signs. The department shall annually review the amount of that fee and revise it as necessary. Funds derived from the imposition of the fee, after deduction of the cost to the department for the placement and maintenance of the information signs, shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for safety roadside rest purposes.

(f) The department shall incorporate the use of an “RV-friendly” symbol on an information sign placed pursuant to this section for a specific roadside business that meets criteria of the department regarding sufficiency for recreational vehicles with respect to the parking spaces and surfaces, vertical clearance, turning radius, and
 entrances and exits of the facility. A specific roadside business otherwise qualified for a sign pursuant to this section may qualify for and request an “RV-friendly” symbol for that sign. The department shall adopt rules and regulations for an “RV-friendly” symbol consistent with this section as well as the Federal Highway Administration’s Interim Approval for Addition of RV-friendly Symbol to Specific Service Signs. The rules and regulations adopted by the department shall include a provision for the roadside business to acknowledge that overnight occupancy is not permitted unless the roadside business is licensed as a special occupancy park as defined in Section 18862.43 of the Health and Safety Code. The department shall establish and charge an additional fee pursuant to subdivision (e) to place and maintain the symbol.

(g) The department shall develop rules and regulations governing signs for approved attractions, which shall include